District of Columbia statutes.
16-4602.03

Jurisdiction to modify determination.

Except as otherwise provided in § 16-4602.04, a court of the District may not modify a child-custody determination made by a court of another state unless a court of the District has jurisdiction to make an initial determination under § 16-4602.01(a)(1) or (2) and:

(1)

The court of the other state determines it no longer has exclusive, continuing jurisdiction under § 16-4602.02 or that a court of the District would be a more convenient forum under § 16-4602.07; or

(2)

A court of the District or a court of the other state determines that the child, the child’s parents, and any person acting as a parent do not presently reside in the other state.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 203 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).
This section is referenced in § 16-4602.02.